apertium-yrl.yrl.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Nheengatú

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    # Numeral
# <prn>    # Pronoun
# <adv>    # Adverb

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
(PxPrnRoot(1) [<prn>:] PxPrnRoot(2) [+:])? NounRoot [<n>:] NounSuffixes? RegNounInfl
:DynInfl VerbRoot [<v>:] DynInfl: Habituality?
:CausInfl NounRoot [<n>:] CausInfl:
:CausInfl VerbRoot [<v>:] CausInfl:
:CausInfl AdjectiveRoot [<adj>:] CausInfl:
AdjectiveRoot [<adj>:]
:AdjectiveRoot [:>{red}] AdjectiveRoot [<adj><sup>:]
Number
Punctuation
FutureCopula
Postpositions [<post>:]
Conjunctions [<cnjsub>:]
LexVerb [<vblex>:]
Adverbs [<adv>:]
1stPrnRoot(1) [<prn>:] 1stPrnRoot(2) RegNounInfl
PxPrnRoot(1) [<prn>:] PxPrnRoot(2)
NounRoot [<n>:] DerivationInfl
VerbRoot [<v>:] DerivationInfl
AdjectiveRoot [<adj>:] DerivationInfl

LEXICON RegNounInfl

<sg>:
<pl>:>itá

LEXICON NounSuffixes

<aug>:>{AUG}{U}su
<aug>:>{AUG}asu # Dir/LR
<aug>:>{AUG}{U}asu # Dir/LR
<dim>:>{I}

LEXICON CausInfl

<caus>:mu>

LEXICON Habituality

<hab>:>uera

LEXICON DerivationInfl

<nmz>:>{DER}saua

LEXICON DynInfl

<pres><p1><sg>:a>
<pres><p1><pl>:ya>
<pres><p2><sg>:re>
<pres><p2><pl>:pe>
<pres><p3><sg>:u>
<pres><p3><pl>:tau>

###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################
kunhã:kunhã
pirá:pirá
iakaré:iakaré
tatu:tatu
iepé:iepé
takuara:takuara
nheenga:nheenga
yawara:yawara
uka:uka
sapukaia:sapukaia
samuara:samuara
igara:igara
kuara:kuara
tainha:tainha
taina:taina
iauara:iauara
rera:rera
apigaua:apigaua
buia:buia
ita:ita
tendaua:tendaua
paranã:paranã
ruiwa:ruiwa
pĩdá:pĩdá
tipiaka:tipiaka
masoka:masoka
kupixá:kupixá
maku:maku
iakaré:iakaré
surubĩ:surubĩ
tukunaré:tukunaré
watukupá:watukupá
kĩyapira:kĩyapira
tipiaka:tipiaka
masoka:masoka
kuradá:kuradá
tukupí:tukupí
ara:ara
pituna:pituna
mimbira:mimbira
anama:anama
pindá:pindá
pinaitikasara:pinaitikasara
taua:taua
rapé:rapé
rembiua:rembiua
mira:mira
nheenga:nheenga
uí:uí
tendaua:tendaua
garapá:garapá
sukuera:sukuera
manha:manha
pu:pu
kuia:kuia
ií:ií
Maria:Maria
Paranãuasu:Paranãuasu
Londres:Londres
tutira:tutira
baniua:baniua
buia:buia
darapi:darapi
gantĩ:gantĩ
garapá:garapá
iakumã:iakumã
iandu:iandu
iapuna:iapuna
iapurá:iapurá
iara:iara
iasi:iasi
iauara:iauara
iauara-kunhã:iauara-kunhã
iauareté:iauareté
iauari:iauari
iauti:iauti
iaxiusaua:iaxiusaua
iepeaua:iepeaua
igarapé:igarapé
igarité:igarité
ira:ira
iriru:iriru
itá:itá
itaité:itaité
iua:iua
iuaka:iuaka
iuí:iuí
iuisé:iuisé
iuitu:iuitu
iukira:iukira
iukuakusaua:iukuakusaua
iumasisaua:iumasisaua
iupati:iupati
iupirisaua:iupirisaua
iurá:iurá
iuru:iuru
Iurupari:Iurupari
iutima:iutima
iuuá:iuuá
kaá:kaá
kakuri:kakuri
kambi:kambi
kamixá:kamixá
kamundusara:kamundusara
kamundusara:kamundusara
kamuti:kamuti
kandiru:kandiru
kariua:kariua
karuka:karuka
katusaua:katusaua
kauera:kauera
kauĩ:kauĩ
kauoka:kauoka
kaxiuera:kaxiuera
kiínha:kiínha
kirimbasaua:kirimbasaua
kisé:kisé
kiuíra:kiuíra
kuara:kuara
kuema:kuema
kumandamiri:kumandamiri
kumaíua:kumaíua
kunhãmuku:kunhãmuku
kunhãuara:kunhãuara
kupé:kupé
kupiĩ:kupiĩ
kupixaua:kupixaua
kurasi:kurasi
kurumi:kurumi
kuximauara:kuximauara
maã:maã
maãsiiara:maãsiiara
makaxera:makaxera
makira:makira
maku:maku
mamaiaku:mamaiaku
manauara:manauara
maniaka:maniaka
manikuera:manikuera
maniua:maniua
maniuatiua:maniuatiua
marandua:marandua
marika:marika
mbuesara:mbuesara
mbuesaua:mbuesaua
meẽsara:meẽsara
meiú:meiú
memũingara:memũingara
memũitaua:memũitaua
memũitendaua:memũitendaua
mena:mena
miapé:miapé
mirá:mirá
mitima:mitima
mituú:mituú
mũ:mũ
muraki:muraki
murakimukũi:murakimukũi
murakimusapíri:murakimusapíri
murakipi:murakipi
murasi:murasi
nambi:nambi
naná:naná
nheengarisara:nheengarisara
paia:paia
paié:paié
pakuatiua:pakuatiua
papera:papera
paranãuasu:paranãuasu
pepu:pepu
pereua:pereua
pi:pi
piá:piá
pikasu:pikasu
pindaíua:pindaíua
pindaua:pindaua
pinimasara:pinimasara
pinimasaua:pinimasaua
pira:pira
piraíua:piraíua
piraruku:piraruku
pirasua:pirasua
pirera:pirera
amũ:amũ
pirera:pirera
piripanasaua:piripanasaua
pisaié:pisaié
pisauera:pisauera
pitera:pitera
pixana:pixana
puãpé:puãpé
purasisaua:purasisaua
pururé:pururé
puruã:puruã
putiá:putiá
putira:putira
puú:puú
saisusaua:saisusaua
sakanga:sakanga
sakusaua:sakusaua
sangaua:sangaua
sanha:sanha
sapu:sapu
sapukaia:sapukaia
sasisaua:sasisaua
sauru:sauru
seẽ:seẽ
sekuiara:sekuiara
sekuiara:sekuiara
sekuiaramirĩ:sekuiaramirĩ
sepi:sepi
sera:sera
sesá:sesá
sesaiukisé:sesaiukisé
setimã:setimã
sikiesaua:sikiesaua
sikusaua:sikusaua
simiriku:simiriku
simiriku-putaua:simiriku-putaua
suá:suá
suaia:suaia
suasu:suasu
suaxara:suaxara
sumuara:sumuara
sumuara-kunhã:sumuara-kunhã
supapau:supapau
supiá:supiá
supitá:supitá
supiuara:supiuara
surisaua:surisaua
suú:suú
taiera:taiera
taína:taína
tainasaua:tainasaua
tainha:tainha
taíra:taíra
taiti:taiti
takua:takua
tamanduá:tamanduá
tamuatá:tamuatá
tamunha:tamunha
tapereiuá:tapereiuá
tapekua:tapekua
tapiíra:tapiíra
tapixaua:tapixaua
tariíra:tariíra
tatá:tatá
tatu:tatu
tendira:tendira
tembiua:tembiua
tetama:tetama
timbiú:timbiú
tuiué:tuiué
tiputi:tiputi
tuí:tuí
tuixaua:tuixaua
tukana:tukana
tukano:tukano
Tupana:Tupana
tupasá:tupasá
tupáuku:tupáuku
uatasara:uatasara
uirá:uirá
uirauasu:uirauasu
uitu:uitu
ukapi:ukapi
uka-pupekasara:uka-pupekasara
ukara:ukara
ukena:ukena
urubu:urubu
urupema:urupema
xibé:xibé
xibuí:xibuí
xipu:xipu
xirura:xirura
ií:ií
Maria:Maria
taua:taua
akaiú:akaiú
akanga:akanga
akangaiuasaua:akangaiuasaua
akari:akari
amana:amana
amanauasu:amanauasu
amaniú:amaniú
Jesus:Jesus
Deus:Deus
mundu:mundu
João:João

LEXICON NounRoot
nheengatu:nheengatu
kunhã:kunhã
pirá:pirá
iakaré:iakaré
tatu:tatu
iepé:iepé
takuara:takuara
nheenga:nheenga
yawara:yawara
uka:uka
sapukaia:sapukaia
samuara:samuara
igara:igara
kuara:kuara
tainha:tainha
taina:taina
iauara:iauara
rera:rera
apigaua:apigaua
buia:buia
ita:ita
tendaua:tendaua
paranã:paranã
ruiwa:ruiwa
pĩdá:pĩdá
tipiaka:tipiaka
masoka:masoka
kupixá:kupixá
maku:maku
iakaré:iakaré
surubĩ:surubĩ
tukunaré:tukunaré
watukupá:watukupá
kĩyapira:kĩyapira
tipiaka:tipiaka
masoka:masoka
kuradá:kuradá
tukupí:tukupí
ara:ara
pituna:pituna
mimbira:mimbira
anama:anama
pindá:pindá
pinaitikasara:pinaitikasara
taua:taua
rapé:rapé
rembiua:rembiua
mira:mira
nheenga:nheenga
uí:uí
tendaua:tendaua
garapá:garapá
sukuera:sukuera
manha:manha
pu:pu
kuia:kuia
ií:ií
Maria:Maria
Paranãuasu:Paranãuasu
Londres:Londres
tutira:tutira
baniua:baniua
buia:buia
darapi:darapi
gantĩ:gantĩ
garapá:garapá
iakumã:iakumã
iandu:iandu
iapuna:iapuna
iapurá:iapurá
iara:iara
iasi:iasi
iauara:iauara
iauara-kunhã:iauara-kunhã
iauareté:iauareté
iauari:iauari
iauti:iauti
iaxiusaua:iaxiusaua
iepeaua:iepeaua
igarapé:igarapé
igarité:igarité
ira:ira
iriru:iriru
itá:itá
itaité:itaité
iua:iua
iuaka:iuaka
iuí:iuí
iuisé:iuisé
iuitu:iuitu
iukira:iukira
iukuakusaua:iukuakusaua
iumasisaua:iumasisaua
iupati:iupati
iupirisaua:iupirisaua
iurá:iurá
iuru:iuru
Iurupari:Iurupari
iutima:iutima
iuuá:iuuá
kaá:kaá
kakuri:kakuri
kambi:kambi
kamixá:kamixá
kamundusara:kamundusara
kamundusara:kamundusara
kamuti:kamuti
kandiru:kandiru
kariua:kariua
karuka:karuka
katusaua:katusaua
kauera:kauera
kauĩ:kauĩ
kauoka:kauoka
kaxiuera:kaxiuera
kiínha:kiínha
kirimbasaua:kirimbasaua
kisé:kisé
kiuíra:kiuíra
kuara:kuara
kuema:kuema
kumandamiri:kumandamiri
kumaíua:kumaíua
kunhãmuku:kunhãmuku
kunhãuara:kunhãuara
kupé:kupé
kupiĩ:kupiĩ
kupixaua:kupixaua
kurasi:kurasi
kurumi:kurumi
kuximauara:kuximauara
maã:maã
maãsiiara:maãsiiara
makaxera:makaxera
makira:makira
maku:maku
mamaiaku:mamaiaku
manauara:manauara
maniaka:maniaka
manikuera:manikuera
maniua:maniua
maniuatiua:maniuatiua
marandua:marandua
marika:marika
mbuesara:mbuesara
mbuesaua:mbuesaua
meẽsara:meẽsara
meiú:meiú
memũingara:memũingara
memũitaua:memũitaua
memũitendaua:memũitendaua
mena:mena
miapé:miapé
mirá:mirá
mitima:mitima
mituú:mituú
mũ:mũ
muraki:muraki
murakimukũi:murakimukũi
murakimusapíri:murakimusapíri
murakipi:murakipi
murasi:murasi
nambi:nambi
naná:naná
nheengarisara:nheengarisara
paia:paia
paié:paié
pakuatiua:pakuatiua
papera:papera
paranãuasu:paranãuasu
pepu:pepu
pereua:pereua
pi:pi
piá:piá
pikasu:pikasu
pindaíua:pindaíua
pindaua:pindaua
pinimasara:pinimasara
pinimasaua:pinimasaua
pira:pira
piraíua:piraíua
piraruku:piraruku
pirasua:pirasua
pirera:pirera
amũ:amũ
pirera:pirera
piripanasaua:piripanasaua
pisaié:pisaié
pisauera:pisauera
pitera:pitera
pixana:pixana
puãpé:puãpé
purasisaua:purasisaua
pururé:pururé
puruã:puruã
putiá:putiá
putira:putira
puú:puú
saisusaua:saisusaua
sakanga:sakanga
sakusaua:sakusaua
sangaua:sangaua
sanha:sanha
sapu:sapu
sapukaia:sapukaia
sasisaua:sasisaua
sauru:sauru
seẽ:seẽ
sekuiara:sekuiara
sekuiara:sekuiara
sekuiaramirĩ:sekuiaramirĩ
sepi:sepi
sera:sera
sesá:sesá
sesaiukisé:sesaiukisé
setimã:setimã
sikiesaua:sikiesaua
sikusaua:sikusaua
simiriku:simiriku
simiriku-putaua:simiriku-putaua
suá:suá
suaia:suaia
suasu:suasu
suaxara:suaxara
sumuara:sumuara
sumuara-kunhã:sumuara-kunhã
supapau:supapau
supiá:supiá
supitá:supitá
supiuara:supiuara
surisaua:surisaua
suú:suú
taiera:taiera
taína:taína
tainasaua:tainasaua
tainha:tainha
taíra:taíra
taiti:taiti
takua:takua
tamanduá:tamanduá
tamuatá:tamuatá
tamunha:tamunha
tapereiuá:tapereiuá
tapekua:tapekua
tapiíra:tapiíra
tapixaua:tapixaua
tariíra:tariíra
tatá:tatá
tatu:tatu
tendira:tendira
tembiua:tembiua
tetama:tetama
timbiú:timbiú
tuiué:tuiué
tiputi:tiputi
tuí:tuí
tuixaua:tuixaua
tukana:tukana
tukano:tukano
Tupana:Tupana
tupasá:tupasá
tupáuku:tupáuku
uatasara:uatasara
uirá:uirá
uirauasu:uirauasu
uitu:uitu
ukapi:ukapi
uka-pupekasara:uka-pupekasara
ukara:ukara
ukena:ukena
urubu:urubu
urupema:urupema
xibé:xibé
xibuí:xibuí
xipu:xipu
xirura:xirura
ií:ií
Maria:Maria
taua:taua
akaiú:akaiú
akanga:akanga
akangaiuasaua:akangaiuasaua
akari:akari
amana:amana
amanauasu:amanauasu
amaniú:amaniú
Jesus:Jesus
Deus:Deus
mundu:mundu
João:João
